zh-TW: 電容公差: -20%/+80%; ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±25%; ±30%; ±40%; ±5%; ±50%; 其他
en: Capacitance tolerance: -20%/+80%; ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±25%; ±30%; ±40%; ±5%; ±50%; Other
da: Kapacitanstolerance: -20%/+80%; ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±25%; ±30%; ±40%; ±5%; ±50%; Andet
fr: Tolérance du condensateur: -20 %/+80 %; ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±15 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±25 %; ±30 %; ±40 %; ±5 %; ±50 %; Autre
ro-RO: Toleranță capacitanță: -20%/+80%; ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±25%; ±30%; ±40%; ±5%; ±50%; Altele
vi: Dung sai điện dung: -20%/+80%; ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±25%; ±30%; ±40%; ±5%; ±50%; Khác
nl: Capaciteit tolerantie: -20 %/+80 %; ± 0,1 %; ± 0,25 %; ± 0,5 %; ± 1 %; ± 10 %; ± 15 %; ± 2 %; ± 20 %; ± 25 %; ± 30 %; ± 40 %; ± 5 %; ± 50 %; Andere
pt-BR: Tolerância de capacitância: -20%/+80%; ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±25%; ±30%; ±40%; ±5%; ±50%; Outro
tr: Kapasitans toleransı: %-20/%+80; %±0.1; %±0.25; %±0.5; %±1; %±10; %±15; %±2; %±20; %±25; %±30; %±40; %±5; %±50; Diğer
hu: Kapacitás-tűréshatár: -20%/+80%; ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±25%; ±30%; ±40%; ±5%; ±50%; Egyéb
nb: Kapasitans toleranse: -20 % / +80 %; ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0.5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±15 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±25 %; ±30 %; ±40 %; ±5 %; ±50 %; Annet
pt-PT: Tolerância de capacitância: -20%/+80%; ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±25%; ±30%; ±40%; ±5%; ±50%; Outro
lt-LT: Talpos tolerancija: –20 % / +80 %; ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±15 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±25 %; ±30 %; ±40 %; ±5 %; ±50 %; Kita
cs: Tolerance kapacity: −20 % / +80 %; ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±15 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±25 %; ±30 %; ±40 %; ±5 %; ±50 %; Jiné
sk-SK: Tolerancia kapacity: -20 %/+80 %; ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±15 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±25 %; ±30 %; ±40 %; ±5 %; ±50 %; Iné
sl-SI: Toleranca kapacitivnosti: -20%/+80%; ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±25%; ±30%; ±40%; ±5%; ±50%; Drugo
fi: Kapasitanssin toleranssi: -20 %/+8 %; ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±15 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±25 %; ±30 %; ±40 %; ±5 %; ±50 %; Muu
hr-HR: Tolerancija kapaciteta: - 20 % / + 80 %; ± 0,1 %; ± 0,25 %; ± 0,5 %; ± 1 %; ± 10 %; ± 15 %; ± 2 %; ± 20 %; ± 25 %; ± 30 %; ± 40 %; ± 5 %; ± 50 %; Ostalo
it: Tolleranza della capacità: -20%/+80%; ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±25%; ±30%; ±40%; ±5%; ±50%; Altro
ko: 정전 용량 허용 오차: -20%/+80%; ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±25%; ±30%; ±40%; ±5%; ±50%; 기타
ja: 静電容量許容誤差: -20%/+80%; ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±25%; ±30%; ±40%; ±5%; ±50%; その他
el: Ανοχή χωρητικότητας: -20%/+80%; ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±25%; ±30%; ±40%; ±5%; ±50%; Άλλο
ru: Допуск емкости: -20 %/+80 %; ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±15 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±25 %; ±30 %; ±40 %; ±5 %; ±50 %; Другой
pl: Tolerancja pojemności: -20%/+80%; ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±25%; ±30%; ±40%; ±5%; ±50%; Inne
zh-CN: 电容容差: -20%/+80%; ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±25%; ±30%; ±40%; ±5%; ±50%; 其他
bg-BG: Толеранс на капацитета: -20%/+80%; ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±25%; ±30%; ±40%; ±5%; ±50%; Други
de: Kapazitätstoleranz: –20 %/+80 %; ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1 %; ±10 %; ±15 %; ±2 %; ±20 %; ±25 %; ±30 %; ±40 %; ±5 %; ±50 %; Sonstiges
es: Tolerancia de capacitancia: -20%/+80%; ±0,1%; ±0,25%; ±0,5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±25%; ±30%; ±40%; ±5%; ±50%; Otros
sv: Kapacitanstolerans: -20%/+80%; ±0,1 %; ±0,25 %; ±0,5 %; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±25%; ±30%; ±40%; ±5%; ±50%; Övrigt
th: ความคลาดเคลื่อนความจุ: -20%/+80%; ±0.1%; ±0.25%; ±0.5%; ±1%; ±10%; ±15%; ±2%; ±20%; ±25%; ±30%; ±40%; ±5%; ±50%; อื่นๆ